Arkansas, session 2025, HB1157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-7-710(c)(2), concerning survivor annuity
benefits for dependent children under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System,
is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) A deceased active member's child shall be considered a
dependent child and eligible for the dependent child annuity until he or she
reaches eighteen (18) twenty-two (22) years of age.
(B)(i) A deceased active member's child shall be
considered a dependent child who is eligible for a dependent child annuity if
the child:
(a) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age and
not older than twenty-two (22) years of age; and
(b) Stays continuously enrolled as a full-time
student in an accredited secondary school, college, university, or
vocational-technical school.
*LJH001*
01/16/2025 9:31:17 AM LJH001

HB1157
(ii) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i)(b) of
this section, a dependent child who enrolls in an accredited college,
university, or vocational-technical school and defers his or her enrollment
in accordance with rules promulgated by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System shall remain eligible to receive a dependent child
annuity during his or her period of deferred enrollment.
(C)(B) Regardless of age, a deceased active member's child
who has been deemed physically or mentally incapacitated by a court of
competent jurisdiction is eligible to receive a dependent child annuity for
as long as the incapacity exists.
(D)(i) A dependent child may have his or her dependent
child annuity temporarily suspended if the dependent child:
(a) Is called to active military duty or
active military training; and
(b) Submits a copy of his or her military
orders to the system.
(ii) The dependent child's dependent child annuity
shall be temporarily suspended for the duration of the dependent child's
participation in active military duty or active military duty training.
(iii) The dependent child's dependent child annuity
shall be reinstated if the dependent child:
(a) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age and
not older than twenty-two (22) years of age;
(b) Immediately enrolls as a full-time student
at an accredited secondary school, college, university, or vocational-
technical school after returning from active military duty or active military
training; and
(c) Submits documentation of his or her
enrollment at an accredited secondary school, college, university, or
vocational-technical school to the system.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-7-710(g), concerning eligibility to
receive a dependent child annuity under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) A dependent child annuity shall be payable to each surviving
child of a retiree who dies after returning to work if the child qualifies as
01/16/2025 9:31:17 AM LJH001

HB1157
a dependent child and is eligible for a dependent child annuity under this
section and the rules and resolutions of the system or a disability retiree
if the surviving child:
(A) Is eligible for a dependent child annuity under this
section and the rules of the system; and
(B) Has not been designated as an option beneficiary of
the retiree who dies after returning to work or the disability retiree.
(2) The provisions of this section that are applicable to the
child of an active member shall be used to determine:
(A) Whether the child of a retiree who dies after
returning to work or the child of a disability retiree qualifies as a
dependent child who is eligible for a dependent child annuity;
(B) When the dependent child annuity is payable to the
child of a retiree who dies after returning to work or the child of a
disability retiree; and
(C) The amount of the dependent child annuity payable to
the child of a retiree who dies after returning to work or the child of a
disability retiree.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the
General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., need immediate revision and updating to
address administrative complexities caused by these provisions and to bring
these provisions into conformance with sound public pension policy and
actuarial requirements; that the revisions and updates are of great
importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other
citizens of the State of Arkansas; that as the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30, a July 1, 2025,
effective date is necessary in order to allow the provisions within this act
to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to allow for a structured
and proper administration of the procedures referenced in this act; that the
updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of
great importance and necessary for protecting member benefits and clarifying
01/16/2025 9:31:17 AM LJH001

HB1157
the reporting and contribution requirements of employers participating in the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order
to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety, shall become effective on July 1, 2025.






























01/16/2025 9:31:17 AM LJH001